sv: Fordon och delar > Fordon > Motorfordon > Motorsportfordon > Racingmotorcyklar: Endurocyklar; Motocrosscyklar; Speedwaycyklar; Trials cyklar
it: Veicoli e parti > Veicoli > Veicoli per terraferma > Veicoli per sport motoristici > Moto da corsa: Moto da Enduro; Moto da cross; Moto da circuito; Moto da trial
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Превозни средства > Моторни превозни средства > Моторни спортни превозни средства > Състезателни мотоциклети: Мотоциклети за еднудо; Кросови мотори; Мотоциклети за спидуей; Мотоциклети за триал
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeuge > Kraftfahrzeuge > Motorsportfahrzeuge > Rennmotorräder: Enduro-Motorräder; Motocross-Motorräder; Speedway-Motorräder; Trial-Motorräder
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Motorna športna vozila > Dirkalna motorna kolesa: Enduro motorna kolesa; Motokros motorna kolesa; Speedway motorna kolesa; Trial motorna kolesa
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járművek > Gépjárművek > Motorsportjárművek > Versenymotorok: Távolsági kerékpárok; Motocross motorok; Speedway motorok; Trial kerékpárok
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ยานพาหนะ > ยานยนต์ > ยานยนต์กีฬามอเตอร์สปอร์ต > มอเตอร์ไซค์แข่ง: จักรยานเอนดูโร; รถมอเตอร์ครอส; จักรยานสปีดเวย์; จักรยานทดลอง
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Οχήματα > Μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα > Οχήματα μηχανοκίνητου αθλητισμού > Αγωνιστικές μοτοσυκλέτες: Μοτοσικλέτες Enduro; Μοτοσικλέτες Motocross; Μοτοσικλέτες Speedway; Μοτοσικλέτες Trials
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Vozidlá > Motorové vozidlá > Motorové športové vozidlá > Závodné motocykle: Enduro bicykle; Motokrosové bicykle; Plochodrážne bicykle; Skúšobné bicykle
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonės > Motorinės transporto priemonės > Motorinės sportinės transporto priemonės > Lenktyniniai motociklai: „Enduro“ motociklai; Motokroso motociklai; Spidvėjaus motociklai; Krosiniai motociklai
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛 > 機動車輛 > 動力運動車輛 > 競速機車: 登山車; 越野機車; 沙地機車; 林道車
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Vehicule > Autovehicule > Vehicule pentru sporturi cu motor > Motociclete de curse: Biciclete Enduro; Biciclete de motocros; Biciclete Speedway; Biciclete trial
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigen > Landvoertuigen > Motorsportvoertuigen > Racemotoren: Enduromotoren; Motocrossmotoren; Speedwaymotoren; Trialmotoren
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos terrestres > Veículos esportivos motorizados > Motocicletas de corrida: Bicicletas de enduro; Motocicletas off-road; Motocicletas de speedway; Motocicletas de trial
da: Køretøjer og dele > Køretøjer > Motorkøretøjer > Motorsportskøretøjer > Racermotorcykler: Enduro-cykler; Motocross-cykler; Speedway-cykler; Trials-cykler
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Транспортные средства > Автотранспорт > Моторные спортивные транспортные средства > Гоночные мотоциклы: Мотоциклы эндуро; Мотоциклы для мотокросса; Мотоциклы для спидвея; Триальные велосипеды
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıtlar > Motorlu Taşıtlar > Motor Sporları Araçları > Yarış Motosikletleri: Enduro Bisikletler; Motokros Bisikletleri; Speedway Bisikletleri; Trial Bisikletler
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Xe cộ > Xe cơ giới > Xe thể thao cơ giới > Mô tô đua: Xe đạp Enduro; Xe đạp địa hình; Xe đạp tốc độ; Xe đạp thử nghiệm
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicles > Motor Vehicles > Motor Sports Vehicles > Racing Motorcycles: Enduro Bikes; Motocross Bikes; Speedway Bikes; Trials Bikes
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物 > 自動車・バイク > モータースポーツ車両 > レーシングバイク: エンデューロバイク; モトクロスバイク; スピードウェイバイク; トライアルバイク
pl: Pojazdy i części > Pojazdy > Pojazdy silnikowe > Pojazdy sportowe > Motocykle wyścigowe: Motocykle enduro; Motocykle motocrossowe; Motocykle żużlowe; Motocykle trialowe
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Vozila za motosport > Trkaći motocikli: Motocikli enduro; Motocikli za motokros; Motocikli za speedway utrke; Motocikli trial
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 > 자동차 > 모터 스포츠 차량 > 경주용 오토바이: 엔듀로 바이크; 모터크로스 바이크; 스피드웨이 바이크; 트라이얼 바이크
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Kjøretøy > Biler > Motorsportskjøretøy > Racermotorsykler: Enduro-sykler; Motocross-sykler; Speedway-sykler; Trialsykler
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具 > 机动车 > 竞赛运动车辆 > 竞赛摩托车: 耐力赛摩托车; 越野赛摩托车; 赛车道摩托车; 障碍赛摩托车
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Véhicules > Véhicules terrestres > Véhicules de sport motorisé > Motos de course: Motos d'enduro; Motos de motocross; Motos Speedway; Motos de trial
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos motorizados > Veículos de desporto motorizados > Motas de corrida: Motas de enduro; Motas de motocross; Motas de speedway; Bicicletas de trial
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvot > Moottoriajoneuvot > Moottoriurheiluajoneuvot > Kilpamoottoripyörät: Enduro-pyörät; Motocross-pyörät; Speedway-pyörät; Trial-pyörät
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Dopravní prostředky > Motorová vozidla > Motorová sportovní vozidla > Závodní motorky: Enduro motocykly; Motokrosové motocykly; Plochodrážní motocykly; Trial motocykly
es: Vehículos y recambios > Vehículos > Vehículos motorizados > Vehículos deportivos de motor > Motos de carreras: Motos de enduro; Motos de motocross; Motos de velocidad; Motos de trials